Utah statutes.
75-3-805.   Classification of claims.

(1)  If the applicable assets of the estate are insufficient to pay all claims in full, the personal representative shall make payment in the following order:

(a)  reasonable funeral expenses;

(b)  costs and expenses of administration;

(c)  debts and taxes with preference under federal law;

(d)  reasonable and necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent, including compensation of persons attending him, and medical assistance if Section 26-19-13.5 applies;

(e)  debts and taxes with preference under other laws of this state; and

(f)  all other claims.

(2)  No preference shall be given in the payment of any claim over any other claim of the same class, and a claim due and payable shall not be entitled to a preference over claims not due.



Amended by Chapter 145, 1998 General Session

